Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-842
Boundary bridge; bonds; annual tax levy; sinking fund.

The proper officers charged with the duty of levying taxes for the county, township, precinct, city or village voting such bonds shall, each year, until the bonds voted under the authority of sections 39-835 to 39-841 are paid, levy upon the taxable property in the county, township, precinct, city or village issuing the bonds, a tax sufficient to pay the interest on such bonds as they mature, and to provide for a sinking fund for the redemption of the bonds at their maturity.

Laws 1895, c. 45, § 5, p. 190;

R.S.1913, § 3000;

C.S.1922, § 2752;

C.S.1929, § 39-838;

R.S.1943, § 39-842.